Utah statutes.
11-2-2.   Entertainment facilities for citizenry.

Such local authorities may organize and conduct plays, games, calisthenics, gymnastics, athletic sports and games, tournaments, meets and leagues, dramatics, picture shows, pageants, festivals and celebrations, community music, clubs, debating societies, public speaking, story telling, hikes, picnics, excursions, camping and handicraft activities, and in areas so remote from regular transmission points of the large television stations that television reception is impossible without special equipment, and adequate, economical and proper television is not available to the public by private sources, said local authorities may equip and maintain television transmission and relay facilities and other forms of recreational activity that may employ the leisure time of the people in a constructive and wholesome manner.

